Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 311.668 is amended to read:
311.668. (1)(a) A claim to defer the property taxes on a homestead that  is eligible for deferral
under ORS 311.670 may be filed  with the county assessor in the manner prescribed under ORS
311.672 by:
(A) An individual who is, or two or more individuals filing a claim jointly  each of whom is, 62
years of age or older on or before April 15 of the calendar year in which the claim is filed; or
(B) An individual who is a person with a disability as of  April 15 of the calendar year in which
the claim  is filed, regardless of the age of the individual or the age or disability of other individuals
occupying the homestead.
(b) If  a guardian or conservator has been appointed for an individual otherwise eligible to claim
deferral of taxes under this section, the guardian or conservator may act for the individual in com-
plying with the provisions of ORS 311.666 to 311.701.
(c) If a trustee of an inter vivos trust that was created by and is revocable by  an individual,
who is both the trustor and a beneficiary of the trust and  who is otherwise eligible to claim deferral
of taxes under this section, owns the fee simple estate under  a recorded instrument of sale, the
trustee may act for the individual in complying with the provisions of ORS 311.666 to 311.701.
(d) This section may not be construed  to require the spouse of an individual to file a claim
jointly with the individual even though the spouse  may be eligible to claim the deferral jointly with
the individual.
(2)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section,  deferral may not be granted under ORS
311.666 to 311.701 with respect to a claim filed by individuals who together have, for the  calendar
year immediately preceding the calendar year in which the claim for deferral is filed:
[(A) Household income of $32,000 or more; or ]
(A) Household income of $70,000 or more; or
(B) Net worth of $500,000 or more.
(b) For each tax year beginning on or after July 1, [ 2002] 2027, the  Department of Revenue shall
recompute the maximum household income under this subsection as follows:
(A) Divide the  average Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region, for the
first six months of the calendar year immediately preceding the calendar year in which the tax  year
Enrolled House Bill 3712 (HB 3712-A) Page 1
begins by the average U.S. City Average Consumer  Price Index for the first six months of [ 2001]
2026.
[(B) Recompute the maximum household income  by multiplying $32,000 by the appropriate indexing
factor determined under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph. ]
(B) Recompute the maximum household income by multiplying $70,000 by the appropriate
indexing factor determined under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(c) Any  change in the maximum household income determined under paragraph (b) of this sub-
section shall be rounded to the nearest multiple of $500.
(3)(a) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, deferral  may not be granted under ORS
311.666 to 311.701 with respect to a claim if, at the time the claim is  filed, property taxes imposed
on the homestead of any individual  filing the claim have been deferred and are delinquent or have
been canceled.
(b) This subsection does not apply to the claim by a  surviving spouse or disabled heir to con-
tinue deferral under ORS 311.688.
SECTION 2.  ORS 311.670 is amended to read:
311.670. (1) Property is not eligible for tax deferral under ORS 311.666 to 311.701 unless, at  the
time a claim is filed and during the period for which deferral is claimed,  the property meets the
requirements of this section.
(2)(a) The property for which the claim is filed must have been the homestead of  the individual
or individuals who file the claim for deferral for at least five years preceding April 15 of the  year
in which the claim is filed.
(b) The five-year requirement under  paragraph (a) of this subsection does not apply to a home-
stead that meets all other requirements  of this section, if the individual or individuals filing the
claim for deferral:
(A) Are required to be absent from the homestead by reason of health;
(B)(i) Moved to the homestead for which the claim is filed from a homestead that was  granted
deferral under ORS 311.666 to 311.701 and was of  greater real market value than the homestead for
which the claim is filed;
(ii) Sell the prior  homestead within one year of purchasing the homestead for which the claim
is filed;
(iii) Satisfy any lien created under ORS 311.673  or 311.679 and attached to the prior homestead;
and
(iv) Provide a written attestation that the individual or individuals incurred debt for  not more
than 80 percent of the purchase price of the homestead for which the claim is filed; or
(C) Are a surviving spouse or disabled heir claiming  continuation of deferral under ORS 311.688.
(3) The individual claiming the deferral, individually or jointly, must own the fee  simple estate
under a recorded instrument of sale, or two or more individuals together must  own the fee simple
estate with rights of survivorship under a recorded instrument of  sale if all owners live in the
property and if all owners apply for the deferral jointly.
(4)(a) The homestead must be insured for fire and other casualty.
(b) If the  homestead meets all other requirements of this section and is insurable for fire and
other casualty but not insured, the Department of Revenue  may purchase insurance for the home-
stead and add the cost of the insurance coverage to a lien created under ORS 311.679.
(5) There may be no prohibition to the deferral of property taxes  contained in any provision of
federal law, rule or  regulation applicable to a mortgage, trust deed, land sale contract or conditional
sale contract for which the homestead is security.
(6) A homestead is not  eligible for deferral under ORS 311.666 to 311.701 unless the real market
value of the homestead entered on the certified assessment and tax roll  for the property tax year
immediately preceding the  property tax year for which the taxes will be deferred is less than the
greater of $250,000 or:
[(a) 100 percent of county median RMV if, as of  April 15 of the year in which a claim is filed, the
taxpayers have continuously owned and occupied the homestead less than seven years. ]
Enrolled House Bill 3712 (HB 3712-A) Page 2
[(b) 110 percent of county median RMV if, as of  April 15 of the year in which a claim is filed, the
taxpayers have continuously owned and occupied  the homestead at least seven years but less than nine
years.]
[(c) 120 percent of county median RMV if, as of April 15 of  the year in which a claim is filed, the
taxpayers have continuously owned and  occupied the homestead at least nine years but less than 11
years.]
[(d) 130 percent of county median RMV if, as  of April 15 of the year in which a claim is filed, the
taxpayers have continuously owned and occupied the homestead at least 11 years but less  than 13
years.]
[(e) 140 percent of county median RMV if, as of April 15 of  the year in which a claim is filed, the
taxpayers have continuously  owned and occupied the homestead at least 13 years but less than 15
years.]
[(f)] (a) 150 percent of county median RMV if, as of April 15 of the year in which a claim is filed,
the taxpayers have continuously owned and occupied the  homestead [ at least 15 years but ] less than
17 years.
[(g)] (b) 160 percent of  county median RMV if, as of April 15 of the year in which a claim is
filed, the taxpayers have continuously owned and occupied the homestead at  least 17 years but less
than 19 years.
[(h)] (c) 170 percent of county median RMV if, as of April 15 of the year in  which a claim is
filed, the taxpayers have continuously owned and occupied the homestead at  least 19 years but less
than 21 years.
[(i)] (d) 200 percent of county median RMV if, as of April 15 of the year in which a claim is filed,
the taxpayers have continuously owned and occupied the homestead at least 21 years but less  than
23 years.
[(j)] (e) 225 percent of county median RMV if, as of April 15 of the year in which a claim is filed,
the taxpayers  have continuously owned and occupied the homestead at least 23 years but less than
25 years.
[(k)] (f) 250 percent of county median RMV if, as of April 15 of the year in which a claim is filed,
the taxpayers have continuously owned and occupied the homestead for 25 years or more.
(7)(a) For each tax year beginning on or after  July 1, 2022, the Department of Revenue shall
recompute the $250,000 minimum cap on allowable  real market value provided under subsection (6)
of this section as follows:
(A) Divide the average Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region,  for the
first six months of the current calendar year by the average  Consumer Price Index for All Urban
Consumers, West Region, for the first six months of 2021.
(B) Recompute the minimum cap on allowable real market value by multiplying $250,000 by  the
appropriate indexing factor determined under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.
(b) Any change in the minimum cap on allowable real market  value determined under paragraph
(a) of this subsection shall be rounded to the nearest multiple of $500.
(8) For purposes of subsection (6)  of this section, a surviving spouse or disabled heir who is el-
igible to claim continuation of deferral  under ORS 311.688 is considered to have owned and occupied
the homestead from the date on which the deceased individual or individuals who filed the claim  for
deferral first owned and occupied the homestead.
SECTION 3. The amendments to ORS 311.668 and 311.670 by sections 1 and 2 of this  2025
Act apply to property tax years beginning on or after July 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. Section 5 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part  of ORS 311.666 to
311.701.
SECTION 5. (1) The Legislative Revenue Officer shall conduct a study  of the homestead
property tax deferral program under ORS 311.666 to 311.701.
(2) The focus of the study shall be:
(a) The equity in homesteads held by:
(A) Taxpayers whose homesteads have been granted deferral; and
Enrolled House Bill 3712 (HB 3712-A) Page 3
(B) Taxpayers whose claims for deferral have been denied; and
(b) The advantages and disadvantages of determining  an individual’s eligibility under ORS
311.668 on the basis of a claimant’s equity in the homestead  rather than the claimant’s
household income.
(3) The Legislative Revenue Officer shall submit a report of the findings of the  study, in
the manner provided in ORS 192.245, to  the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly
related to revenue, no later than September 15, 2026.
SECTION 6.
Section 5 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.
Passed by House May 15, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3712 (HB 3712-A) Page 4